Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-162
Violations; penalty.

Any telecommunications company or its agent who fails or neglects to comply with section 86-131, 86-132, 86-140, 86-141, or 86-153 or who violates any of the provisions of such sections is guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VI, § 10, p. 1421;

Laws 1982, LB 573, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 106;

Laws 2000, LB 1285, § 12;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 75-610;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 61.